Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
There are appropriated to the Secretary of State, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2017, out of the General Fund, the following amounts, for the following purposes:
(1) Administrative Services
Division..................................... $ 2,662,569
(2) Elections Division ..................... $ 7,404,696
(3) Elections Division,
distributions to counties ........... $ 706,000
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected  or received by the Secretary of State, for
the following purposes:
(1) Administrative Services
Division..................................... $ 17,662,953
(2) Elections Division ..................... $ 1,136,593
(3) Audits Division.......................... $ 21,468,989
(4) Archives Division ...................... $ 7,584,077
(5) Corporation Division................. $ 10,018,899
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$5,194,107 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from federal funds collected or received by the Secretary of State.
SECTION 4. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
July 1, 2017.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5536 (SB 5536-A) Page 1
Passed by Senate July 4, 2017
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House July 6, 2017
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5536 (SB 5536-A) Page 2